North Carolina, session 2025, SB1038.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 2 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 90-30.3. Reports of adverse events.
(a) A dentist who holds a permit to administer general anesthesia or sedation shall submit
an adverse event report to the Board within 72 hours after each adverse event if the patient dies
or has permanent organic brain dysfunction within 24 hours after the administration of general
anesthesia or sedation. Sedation permit holders shall cease administration of sedation until the
Board has investigated the death or permanent organic brain dysfunction and approved
resumption of permit privileges. General anesthesia permit holders shall cease administration of
general anesthesia and sedation until the Board has reviewed the adverse event report and
approved resumption of permit privileges.
(b) A dentist who holds a permit to administer general anesthesia or sedation shall submit
an adverse event report to the Board within 30 days after each adverse event if the patient is
admitted to a hospital on inpatient status for a medical emergency or physical injury within 24
hours after the administration of general anesthesia or sedation.
(c) A dentist who holds a permit to administer general anesthesia or sedation shall submit
an adverse event report to the Board within 30 days after each adverse event.
(d) The adverse event report shall be in writing and shall include, at a minimum, all of
the following:
(1) Dentist's name, license number, and permit number.
(2) Date and time of the occurrence.
(3) Facility where the occurrence took place.
(4) Name and address of the patient.
(5) Surgical procedure involved.
(6) Type and dosage of sedation or anesthesia utilized in the procedure.
(7) Circumstances involved in the occurrence.
(8) The entire patient treatment record, including anesthesia records.
(e) Upon receipt of an adverse event report under this section, the Board shall investigate
and shall take disciplinary action if the evidence demonstrates that a licensee has violated this
Article.
*S1038-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f) For the purposes of this section, the term "adverse event" means any of the following
clinical emergencies: anaphylaxis, aspiration, cardiac arrest, or unplanned advanced airway
placement."
SECTION 2. The North Carolina Policy Collaboratory at the University of North
Carolina at Chapel Hill shall conduct a study to evaluate whether a second health care provider
who is qualified to provide anesthesia services is needed when utilizing drugs that can lead to
deep sedation, such as propofol. The Collaboratory shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services by April 1, 2027, with any legislative
recommendations addressing this issue.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina to allocate to the North Carolina Policy Collaboratory at the
University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to conduct the study under Section 2 of this
act.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this act becomes effective October 1, 2026. Section 3 of
this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1038-First Edition